Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-118
Annexed cities and villages; books, records, property; transfer to city; offices; termination.

All officers of any city of the second class or village so consolidated with or annexed by such city of the primary class having books, papers, records, bonds, funds, effects or property of any kind in their hands or under their control belonging to any such city of the second class or village, shall upon taking effect of such consolidation or annexation deliver the same to the respective officers of such city of the primary class as may be by law or ordinance or limitation of such city entitled or authorized to receive the same. Upon such consolidation or annexation taking effect, the terms and tenure of all offices and officers of any such city of the second class or village so consolidated with or annexed by such city of the primary class shall terminate and entirely cease.

Laws 1921, c. 202, § 8, p. 732;

C.S.1922, § 3797;

C.S.1929, § 15-118;

R.S.1943, § 15-118;

Laws 1965, c. 43, § 6, p. 241.